Utah statutes.
78B-13-210.   Appearance of parties and child.

(1)  A court of this state may order a party to a child custody proceeding who is in this state to appear before the court personally with or without the child.  The court may order any person who is in this state and who has physical custody or control of the child to appear physically with the child.

(2)  If a party to a child custody proceeding whose presence is desired by the court is outside this state, the court may order that a notice given pursuant to Section 78B-13-108 include a statement directing the party to appear personally with or without the child and declaring that failure to appear may result in a decision adverse to the party.

(3)  The court may enter any orders necessary to ensure the safety of the child and of any person ordered to appear under this section.

(4)  If a party to a child custody proceeding who is outside this state is directed to appear under Subsection (2) or desires to appear personally before the court with or without the child, the court may require another party to pay reasonable and necessary travel and other expenses of the party so appearing and of the child.

